Nebraska, session 109, LB515.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB515 LB515
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-28,104, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
38-28,104 (1) A prescription for a legend drug which is not a
controlled substance must contain the following information prior to
being filled by a pharmacist or a practitioner who holds a pharmacy
license under subdivision (1) of section 38-2850: Patient's name, or if
not issued for a specific patient, the words "for emergency use" or "for
use in immunizations"; name of the drug, device, or biological; strength
of the drug or biological, if applicable; dosage form of the drug or
biological; quantity of drug, device, or biological prescribed; number of
authorized refills; directions for use; date of issuance; prescribing
practitioner's name; and if the prescription is written, prescribing
practitioner's signature. Prescriptions for controlled substances must
meet the requirements of sections 28-414 and 28-414.01.
(2) If a pharmacist receives a request for a prescription refill
with no refill authorization and the pharmacist is unable to readily
obtain refill authorization from the prescribing practitioner, the
pharmacist may dispense an emergency refill of no more than a thirty-day
supply of the prescription, or the amount dispensed on the most recent
refill, whichever is less, if:
(a) The pharmacist obtains prescription information from: (i) A
prescription label; (ii) a prescription record located in any pharmacy;
or (iii) a common database;
(b) The prescription refill is not for a controlled substance;
(c) The prescription refill is for a maintenance medication; and
(d) In the pharmacist's professional judgment, the interruption of
therapy may produce undesirable consequences or may be detrimental to the
patient's welfare and cause physical or mental discomfort.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-28,104, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-